en: Cooked scallops with coral
fr: Coquille Saint-Jacques cuite avec noix et corail

en: Scallops without coral
fr: Coquilles Saint-Jacques avec noix

en: Frozen scallops without coral
fr: Noix de coquilles Saint-Jacques surgelées

en: American sea scallop without coral, Canadian sea scallop without coral
fr: Pecten d'Amérique avec noix cru, Peigne du Canada avec noix
zh: 不带珊瑚部分的美国海扇贝

en: Peru sea scallop without coral
fr: Pétoncle avec noix crue, Peigne du Pérou avec noix

en: Eels
fr: Anguilles
hr: Jegulje
ja: ウナギ目
nl: Paling, Aal

en: Raw eels, Raw eel
fr: Anguilles crues, Anguille crue

en: Cooked eels, Cooked eel
fr: Anguilles cuites, Anguille cuite

en: Roasted eel, Baked eal
fr: Anguille rôtie, Anguille cuite au four

en: Boiled eel, Eel cooked in water
fr: Anguille bouillie, Anguille cuite à l'eau

en: Smoked eel
fr: Anguille fumée

en: Chinese sea products
de: Chinesische Meeresprodukte
es: Productos del mar chinos
fr: Produits de la mer chinois
hr: Kineski morski proizvodi
it: Prodotti ittici cinesi

en: Boiled lobster, Lobster cooked in water
fr: Homard bouilli, Homard cuit à l'eau

en: Frozen cooked lobster
fr: Homard cuit surgelé

en: Frozen lobsters, frozen lobster
fr: Homard surgelé, homards surgelés

en: Spiny lobsters
fr: Langouste

en: Frozen spiny lobsters
fr: Langouste surgelée

en: Boiled spiny lobster, Spiny lobster cooked in water
fr: Langouste bouillie, Langouste cuite à l'eau

en: Frozen cooked spiny lobster
fr: Langouste cuite surgelée

en: Finnish sea products
de: Finnische Meeresprodukte
es: Productos del mar finlandeses
fr: Produits de la mer finnois
hr: Finski morski proizvodi
it: Prodotti ittici finlandesi